South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3443.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 1, Title 11 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 11-1-130.  A state agency that receives a grant from any source shall maintain an itemized list of any matching funds the agency is providing. The agency also shall maintain a summary of any conditions associated with the grant that the agency must comply with in order to receive the grant money and any conditions on how the grant money must be spent. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----